Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2399.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-101, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-101. Definitions In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol, including ethanol, methanol, propynol and isopropynol. 2. "Alcohol concentration" if expressed as a percentage means either: (a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of blood. (b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath. 3. "All-terrain vehicle" means either of the following: (a) A motor vehicle that satisfies all of the following: (i) Is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel. (ii) Is fifty or fewer inches in width. (iii) Has an unladen weight of one thousand two hundred pounds or less. (iv) Travels on three or more nonhighway tires. (v) Is operated on a public highway. (b) A recreational off-highway vehicle that satisfies all of the following: (i) Is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel. (ii) Is eighty or fewer inches in width. (iii) Has an unladen weight of two thousand five hundred pounds or less. (iv) Travels on four or more nonhighway tires. (v) Has a steering wheel for steering control. (vi) Has a rollover protective structure. (vii) Has an occupant retention system. 4. "apply and application" means the process in which a person provides required information in a manner PReSCRIBED by the department for services RENDERED by the department. 4. 5. "Authorized emergency vehicle" means any of the following: (a) A fire department vehicle. (b) A police vehicle. (c) An ambulance or emergency vehicle of a municipal department or public service corporation that is designated or authorized by the department or a local authority. (d) Any other ambulance, fire truck or rescue vehicle that is authorized by the department in its sole discretion and that meets liability insurance requirements prescribed by the department. 5. 6. "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle on which the driver and passengers ride in a fully or partially enclosed seating area that is equipped with a roll cage, safety belts for each occupant and antilock brakes and that is designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals. 6. 7. "Automated driving system" means the hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether it is limited to a specific operational design domain. 7. 8. "Automotive recycler" means a person that is engaged in the business of buying or acquiring a motor vehicle solely for the purpose of dismantling, selling or otherwise disposing of the parts or accessories and that removes parts for resale from six or more vehicles in a calendar year. 8. 9. "Autonomous vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is equipped with an automated driving system. 9. 10. "Aviation fuel" means all flammable liquids composed of a mixture of selected hydrocarbons expressly manufactured and blended for the purpose of effectively and efficiently operating an internal combustion engine for use in an aircraft but does not include fuel for jet or turbine powered aircraft. 10. 11. "Bicycle" means a device, including a racing wheelchair, that is propelled by human power and on which a person may ride and that has either: (a) Two tandem wheels, either of which is more than sixteen inches in diameter. (b) Three wheels in contact with the ground, any of which is more than sixteen inches in diameter. 11. 12. "Board" means the transportation board. 12. 13. "Bus" means a motor vehicle designed for carrying sixteen or more passengers, including the driver. 13. 14. "Business district" means the territory contiguous to and including a highway if there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes within any six hundred feet along the highway, including hotels, banks or office buildings, railroad stations and public buildings that occupy at least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet collectively on both sides of the highway. 14. 15. "Certificate of ownership" means a paper or an electronic record that is issued in another state or a foreign jurisdiction and that indicates ownership of a vehicle. 15. 16. "Certificate of title" means a paper document or an electronic record that is issued by the department and that indicates ownership of a vehicle. 16. 17. "Combination of vehicles" means a truck or truck tractor and semitrailer and any trailer that it tows but does not include a forklift designed for the purpose of loading or unloading the truck, trailer or semitrailer. 17. 18. "Controlled substance" means a substance so classified under section 102(6) of the controlled substances act (21 United States Code section 802(6)) and includes all substances listed in schedules I through V of 21 Code of Federal Regulations part 1308. 18. 19. "Conviction" means: (a) An unvacated adjudication of guilt or a determination that a person violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized administrative tribunal. (b) An unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person's appearance in court. (c) A plea of guilty or no contest accepted by the court. (d) The payment of a fine or court costs. 19. 20. "County highway" means a public road that is constructed and maintained by a county. 20. 21. "Dealer" means a person who is engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers and who has an established place of business and has paid fees pursuant to section 28-4302. 21. 22. "Department" means the department of transportation acting directly or through its duly authorized officers and agents. 22. 23. "Digital network or software application" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 23. 24. "Director" means the director of the department of transportation. 24. 25. "Drive" means to operate or be in actual physical control of a motor vehicle. 25. 26. "Driver" means a person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle. 26. 27. "Driver license" means a license that is issued by a state to an individual and that authorizes the individual to drive a motor vehicle. 27. 28. "Dynamic driving task": (a) Means all of the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic. (b) Includes: (i) Lateral vehicle motion control by steering. (ii) Longitudinal motion control by acceleration and deceleration. (iii) Monitoring the driving environment by object and event detection, recognition, classification and response preparation. (iv) Object and event response execution. (v) Maneuver planning. (vi) Enhancing conspicuity by lighting, signaling and gesturing. (c) Does not include strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selecting destinations and waypoints. 28. 29. "Electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts and that meets the requirements of one of the following classes: (a) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (b) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle or tricycle and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (c) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour. 29. 30. "Electric miniature scooter" means a device that: (a) Weighs less than thirty pounds. (b) Has two or three wheels. (c) Has handlebars. (d) Has a floorboard on which a person may stand while riding. (e) Is powered by an electric motor or human power, or both. (f) Has a maximum speed that does not exceed ten miles per hour, with or without human propulsion, on a paved level surface. 30. 31. "Electric personal assistive mobility device" means a self-balancing device with one wheel or two nontandem wheels and an electric propulsion system that limits the maximum speed of the device to fifteen miles per hour or less and that is designed to transport only one person. 31. 32. "Electric standup scooter": (a) Means a device that: (i) Weighs less than seventy-five pounds. (ii) Has two or three wheels. (iii) Has handlebars. (iv) Has a floorboard on which a person may stand while riding. (v) Is powered by an electric motor or human power, or both. (vi) Has a maximum speed that does not exceed twenty miles per hour, with or without human propulsion, on a paved level surface. (b) Does not include an electric miniature scooter. 32. 33. "Evidence" includes both of the following: (a) A display on a wireless communication device of a department-generated driver license, nonoperating identification license, vehicle registration card or other official record of the department that is presented to a law enforcement officer or in a court or an administrative proceeding. (b) An electronic or digital license plate authorized pursuant to section 28-364. 33. 34. "Farm" means any lands primarily used for agriculture production. 34. 35. "Farm tractor" means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing implements of husbandry. 35. 36. "Foreign vehicle" means a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer that is brought into this state other than in the ordinary course of business by or through a manufacturer or dealer and that has not been registered in this state. 36. 37. "Fully autonomous vehicle" means an autonomous vehicle that is equipped with an automated driving system designed to function as a level four or five system under SAE J3016 and that may be designed to function either: (a) Solely by use of the automated driving system. (b) By a human driver when the automated driving system is not engaged. 37. 38. "Golf cart" means a motor vehicle that has not less than three wheels in contact with the ground, that has an unladen weight of less than one thousand eight hundred pounds, that is designed to be and is operated at not more than twenty-five miles per hour and that is designed to carry not more than four persons including the driver. 38. 39. "Gross combined weight rating" means the sum of the gross vehicle weight rating of a motor vehicle and the trailer or semitrailer the motor vehicle tows. 39. 40. "Gross vehicle weight rating" means the weight that is assigned by the motor vehicle manufacturer to a motor vehicle and that represents the maximum recommended total weight, including the vehicle and the load for the vehicle. 40. 41. "Hazardous material" means a material, and its mixtures or solutions, that the United States department of transportation determines under 49 Code of Federal Regulations is, or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin under 42 Code of Federal Regulations part 73 that is, capable of posing an unreasonable risk to health, safety and property if transported in commerce and that is required to be placarded or marked as required by the department's safety rules prescribed pursuant to chapter 14 of this title. 41. 42. "Human driver" means a natural person in the vehicle who performs in real time all or part of the dynamic driving task or who achieves a minimal risk condition for the vehicle. 42. 43. "Implement of husbandry" means a vehicle that is designed primarily for agricultural purposes and that is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations, including an implement or vehicle that uses an automated driving system or that is autonomous or that is self-propelled or otherwise, whether operated manually, equipped with an automated driving system that is not in use or equipped with an automated driving system that is in use, and that meets both of the following conditions: (a) Is used solely for agricultural purposes, including the preparation or harvesting of cotton, alfalfa, grains, specialty crops and other farm crops.  For the purposes of this subdivision, "specialty crops" includes fruits, vegetables, tree nuts, dried fruits and horticulture and nursery crops, including floriculture. (b) Is only incidentally operated or moved on a highway whether as a trailer or an autonomous vehicle or a self-propelled unit. For the purposes of this subdivision, "incidentally operated or moved on a highway" means travel between a farm and another part of the same farm, from one farm to another farm or between a farm and a place of repair, supply or storage. 43. 44. "Limousine" means a motor vehicle providing prearranged ground transportation service for an individual passenger, or a group of passengers, that is arranged in advance or is operated on a regular route or between specified points and includes ground transportation under a contract or agreement for services that includes a fixed rate or time and is provided in a motor vehicle with a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers including the driver. 44. 45. "Livery vehicle" means a motor vehicle that: (a) Has a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers including the driver. (b) Provides passenger services for a fare determined by a flat rate or flat hourly rate between geographic zones or within a geographic area. (c) Is available for hire on an exclusive or shared ride basis. (d) May do any of the following: (i) Operate on a regular route or between specified places. (ii) Offer prearranged ground transportation service as defined in section 28-141. (iii) Offer on demand ground transportation service pursuant to a contract with a public airport, licensed business entity or organization. 45. 46. "Local authority" means any county, municipal or other local board or body exercising jurisdiction over highways under the constitution and laws of this state. 46. 47. "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of manufacturing motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers. 47. 48. "Minimal risk condition": (a) Means a condition to which a human driver or an automated driving system may bring a vehicle in order to reduce the risk of a crash when a given trip cannot or should not be completed. (b) Includes bringing the vehicle to a complete stop. 48. 49. "Moped" means a bicycle, not including an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter or an electric standup scooter, that is equipped with a helper motor if the vehicle has a maximum piston displacement of fifty cubic centimeters or less, a brake horsepower of one and one-half or less and a maximum speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less on a flat surface with less than a one percent grade. 49. 50. "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle that has a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and that is designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground but excludes a tractor, an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter, an electric standup scooter and a moped. 50. 51. "Motor driven cycle" means a motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a motor that produces not more than five horsepower but does not include an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter or an electric standup scooter. 51. 52. "Motorized quadricycle" means a self-propelled motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (a) The vehicle is self-propelled by an emission-free electric motor and may include pedals operated by the passengers. (b) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (c) The vehicle seats at least eight passengers, including the driver. (d) The vehicle is operable on a flat surface using solely the electric motor without assistance from the pedals or passengers. (e) The vehicle is a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 28-5201. (f) The vehicle is a limousine operating under a vehicle for hire company permit issued pursuant to section 28-9503. (g) The vehicle is manufactured by a motor vehicle manufacturer that is licensed pursuant to chapter 10 of this title. (h) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. 52. 53. "Motor vehicle": (a) Means either: (i) A self-propelled vehicle. (ii) For the purposes of the laws relating to the imposition of a tax on motor vehicle fuel, a vehicle that is operated on the highways of this state and that is propelled by the use of motor vehicle fuel. (b) Does not include a scrap vehicle, a personal delivery device, a personal mobile cargo carrying device, a motorized wheelchair, an electric personal assistive mobility device, an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter, an electric standup scooter or a motorized skateboard. For the purposes of this subdivision: (i) "Motorized skateboard" means a self-propelled device that does not have handlebars and that has a motor, a deck on which a person may ride and at least two tandem wheels in contact with the ground. (ii) "Motorized wheelchair" means a self-propelled wheelchair that is used by a person for mobility. 53. 54. "Motor vehicle fuel" includes all products that are commonly or commercially known or sold as gasoline, including casinghead gasoline, natural gasoline and all flammable liquids, and that are composed of a mixture of selected hydrocarbons expressly manufactured and blended for the purpose of effectively and efficiently operating internal combustion engines. Motor vehicle fuel does not include inflammable liquids that are specifically manufactured for racing motor vehicles and that are distributed for and used by racing motor vehicles at a racetrack, use fuel as defined in section 28-5601, aviation fuel, fuel for jet or turbine powered aircraft or the mixture created at the interface of two different substances being transported through a pipeline, commonly known as transmix. 54. 55. "Neighborhood electric shuttle": (a) Means a self-propelled electrically powered motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (i) The vehicle is emission free. (ii) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (iii) The vehicle is capable of transporting at least eight passengers, including the driver. (iv) The vehicle is a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 28-5201. (v) The vehicle is a vehicle for hire as defined in section 28-9501 and operates under a vehicle for hire company permit issued pursuant to section 28-9503. (vi) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. (b) Includes a vehicle that meets the standards prescribed in subdivision (a) of this paragraph and that has been modified after market and not by the manufacturer to transport up to fifteen passengers, including the driver. 55. 56. "Neighborhood electric vehicle" means a self-propelled electrically powered motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (a) The vehicle is emission free. (b) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (c) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles, unless excepted or exempted under federal law, set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. 56. 57. "Neighborhood occupantless electric vehicle" means a neighborhood electric vehicle that is not designed, intended or marketed for human occupancy. 57. 58. "Nonresident" means a person who is not a resident of this state as defined in section 28-2001. 58. 59. "Off-road recreational motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel and that is not operated on a public highway. Off-road recreational motor vehicle does not mean a motor vehicle used for construction, building trade, mining or agricultural purposes. 59. 60. "Operational design domain": (a) Means operating conditions under which a given automated driving system is specifically designed to function. (b) Includes roadway types, speed range, environmental conditions, such as weather or time of day, and other domain constraints. 60. 61. "Operator" means a person who drives a motor vehicle on a highway, who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway or who is exercising control over or steering a vehicle being towed by a motor vehicle. 61. 62. "Owner" means: (a) A person who holds the legal title of a vehicle. (b) If a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease with the right of purchase on performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, the conditional vendee or lessee. (c) If a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession of the vehicle, the mortgagor. 62. 63. "Pedestrian" means any person afoot. A person who uses an electric personal assistive mobility device or a manual or motorized wheelchair is considered a pedestrian unless the manual wheelchair qualifies as a bicycle. For the purposes of this paragraph, "motorized wheelchair" means a self-propelled wheelchair that is used by a person for mobility. 63. 64. "Personal delivery device": (a) Means a device that is both of the following: (i) Manufactured for transporting cargo and goods in an area described in section 28-1225. (ii) Equipped with automated driving technology, including software and hardware, that enables the operation of the device with the remote support and supervision of a human. (b) Does not include a personal mobile cargo carrying device. 64. 65. "Personal mobile cargo carrying device" means an electronically powered device that: (a) Is operated primarily on sidewalks and within crosswalks and that is designed to transport property. (b) Weighs less than eighty pounds, excluding cargo. (c) Operates at a maximum speed of twelve miles per hour. (d) Is equipped with technology to transport personal property with the active monitoring of a property owner and that is primarily designed to remain within twenty-five feet of the property owner. (e) Is equipped with a braking system that when active or engaged enables the personal mobile cargo carrying device to come to a controlled stop. 65. 66. "Power sweeper" means an implement, with or without motive power, that is only incidentally operated or moved on a street or highway and that is designed for the removal of debris, dirt, gravel, litter or sand whether by broom, vacuum or regenerative air system from asphaltic concrete or cement concrete surfaces, including parking lots, highways, streets and warehouses, and a vehicle on which the implement is permanently mounted. 66. 67. "Public transit" means the transportation of passengers on scheduled routes by means of a conveyance on an individual passenger fare-paying basis excluding transportation by a sightseeing bus, school bus or taxi or a vehicle not operated on a scheduled route basis. 67. 68. "Reconstructed vehicle" means a vehicle that has been assembled or constructed largely by means of essential parts, new or used, derived from vehicles or makes of vehicles of various names, models and types or that, if originally otherwise constructed, has been materially altered by the removal of essential parts or by the addition or substitution of essential parts, new or used, derived from other vehicles or makes of vehicles. For the purposes of this paragraph, "essential parts" means integral and body parts, the removal, alteration or substitution of which will tend to conceal the identity or substantially alter the appearance of the vehicle. 68. 69. "Residence district" means the territory contiguous to and including a highway not comprising a business district if the property on the highway for a distance of three hundred feet or more is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business. 69. 70. "Right-of-way" when used within the context of the regulation of the movement of traffic on a highway means the privilege of the immediate use of the highway. Right-of-way when used within the context of the real property on which transportation facilities and appurtenances to the facilities are constructed or maintained means the lands or interest in lands within the right-of-way boundaries. 70. 71. "SAE J3016" means surface transportation recommended practice J3016 taxonomy and definitions for terms related to driving automation systems for on-road motor vehicles published by SAE international in June 2018. 71. 72. "School bus" means a motor vehicle that is designed for carrying more than ten passengers and that is either: (a) Owned by any public or governmental agency or other institution and operated for the transportation of children to or from home or school on a regularly scheduled basis. (b) Privately owned and operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from home or school on a regularly scheduled basis. 72. 73. "Scrap metal dealer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-1641. 73. 74. "Scrap vehicle" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-1641. 74. 75. "Semitrailer" means a vehicle that is with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer or single-axle tow dolly, that is designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and that is constructed so that some part of its weight and that of its load rests on or is carried by another vehicle. For the purposes of this paragraph, "pole trailer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-601. 75. 76. "Single-axle tow dolly" means a nonvehicle device that is drawn by a motor vehicle, that is designed and used exclusively to transport another motor vehicle and on which the front or rear wheels of the drawn motor vehicle are mounted on the tow dolly while the other wheels of the drawn motor vehicle remain in contact with the ground. 76. 77. "State" means a state of the United States and the District of Columbia. 77. 78. "State highway" means a state route or portion of a state route that is accepted and designated by the board as a state highway and that is maintained by the state. 78. 79. "State route" means a right-of-way whether actually used as a highway or not that is designated by the board as a location for the construction of a state highway. 79. 80. "Street" or "highway" means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way if a part of the way is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. 80. 81. "Taxi" means a motor vehicle that has a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers, including the driver, that provides passenger services and that: (a) Does not primarily operate on a regular route or between specified places. (b) Offers local transportation for a fare determined on the basis of the distance traveled or prearranged ground transportation service as defined in section 28-141 for a predetermined fare. 81. 82. "Title transfer form" means a paper or an electronic form that is prescribed by the department for the purpose of transferring a certificate of title from one owner to another owner. 82. 83. "Traffic survival school" means a school that is licensed pursuant to chapter 8, article 7.1 of this title and that offers educational sessions that are designed to improve the safety and habits of drivers and that are approved by the department. 83. 84. "Trailer" means a vehicle that is with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer or single-axle tow dolly, that is designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and that is constructed so that no part of its weight rests on the towing vehicle. A semitrailer equipped with an auxiliary front axle commonly known as a dolly is deemed to be a trailer. For the purposes of this paragraph, "pole trailer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-601. 84. 85. "Transportation network company" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 85. 86. "Transportation network company vehicle" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 86. 87. "Transportation network service" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 87. 88. "Truck" means a motor vehicle designed or used primarily for the carrying of property other than the effects of the driver or passengers and includes a motor vehicle to which has been added a box, a platform or other equipment for such carrying. 88. 89. "Truck tractor" means a motor vehicle that is designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and that is not constructed to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load drawn. 89. 90. "Vehicle": (a) Means a device in, on or by which a person or property is or may be transported or drawn on a public highway. (b) Does not include: (i) Electric bicycles, electric miniature scooters, electric standup scooters and devices moved by human power. (ii) Devices used exclusively on stationary rails or tracks. (iii) Personal delivery devices. (iv) Scrap vehicles. (v) Personal mobile cargo carrying devices. 90. 91. "Vehicle transporter" means either: (a) A truck tractor capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer. (b) A truck tractor with a stinger-steered fifth wheel capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer or a truck tractor with a dolly mounted fifth wheel that is securely fastened to the truck tractor at two or more points and that is capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-337, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-337. High occupancy vehicle lane; lane degradation; priority use A. In accordance with 23 United States Code section 166, the department shall develop procedures to monitor the impact that single occupancy vehicles authorized under sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01 have on the operation of the high occupancy vehicle lanes. B. If a high occupancy vehicle lane becomes degraded due to the authorization of single occupancy vehicles authorized under sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01, use of the lane is restricted to the following vehicles in the following priority: 1. Passenger vehicles with two or more occupants, including the driver. 2. Public transit buses. 3. Buses with two or more occupants, including the driver. 4. Motorcycles. 5. Alternative fuel vehicles. 6. Low emission and energy efficient vehicles as defined in section 28-601. 7. Blood transport vehicles as defined in section 28-737. C. The department shall limit the use of the high occupancy vehicle lanes to vehicles in the priority order prescribed in subsection B of this section and shall maintain those restrictions while the lane or portion of the lane remains degraded. D. For the purposes of this section, a high occupancy vehicle lane is degraded if vehicles operating on the facility, or portions of the facility, are failing to maintain a speed of forty-five miles per hour or greater ninety per cent percent of the time over a consecutive one hundred eighty day eighty-day period during morning and evening weekday peak hour periods. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 28-737, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-737. High occupancy vehicle lanes; exceptions; civil penalty; definitions A. Except as provided in sections 28-2416 and 28-2416.01 and subsection B of this section, a person shall not drive a vehicle carrying fewer than two persons, including the driver, in a high occupancy vehicle lane at any time the use of the high occupancy vehicle lane is restricted to vehicles carrying two or more persons, including the driver. B. Subsection A of this section does not apply to any of the following: 1. During the performance of a tow truck operator's duties, a tow truck operator driving a tow truck. 2. A person driving a motorcycle. 3. A person driving a public transportation vehicle. 4. An authorized emergency vehicle as defined in section 28-101 that is in use by a first responder in the line of duty. 5. A blood transport vehicle if the vehicle displays on each side and on the rear of the vehicle a removable decal or sign indicating that the vehicle is transporting human blood or blood products. C. A person who violates subsection A of this section is subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars $200. D. Notwithstanding section 28-1554, one hundred dollars $100 of each civil penalty collected pursuant to subsection C of this section shall be deposited in the state general fund. E. For the purposes of this section: , 1. "blood transport vehicle" MEANS a motor vehicle that is owned or OPERATED by a nonprofit general blood banking OPERATION, a nonprofit blood bank or a nonprofit blood bank's agent and that is transporting blood or blood products between collection points, HOSPITALS or blood storage centers. 2. "Public transportation vehicle" means any vehicle that provides a public entity's public transportation service and either: 1. (a) Is owned or operated by the public entity. 2. (b) Is operated under a contract with the public entity. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Repeal Section 28-2410, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 5. Section 28-3158, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3158. Driver license or instruction permit application A. A person who applies for an instruction permit or for a driver license shall use a form furnished by the department. B. An applicant shall pay the fee prescribed by section 28-3002 for a driver license or for an instruction permit issued under section 28-3154, 28-3155, 28-3156 or 28-3225. The department shall refund an application fee pursuant to section 28-373. C. An applicant for an instruction permit or a driver license shall give the department satisfactory proof of the applicant's full legal name, date of birth, sex and domicile residence address in this state, if the applicant has a residence address, and that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law. D. The application for an instruction permit or a driver license shall state may include the following: 1. A brief description of the applicant and any other identifying information required by the department. 2. Whether the applicant has been licensed, and if so, the type of license issued, when the license was issued and what state or country issued the license. 3. If the applicant was never licensed, the applicant's last previous state or country of residence. 4. The social security number of the applicant. 5. Other information required by the department. E. The department shall: 1. Verify that a social security number provided by an applicant is a valid number assigned to that applicant. 2. Retain the social security number in its records. F. The social security number provided to the department pursuant to subsection D of this section for an applicant's driver license or instruction permit shall not appear on an applicant's driver license or instruction permit unless the applicant requests that the social security number appear on the applicant's driver license or instruction permit as the driver license or instruction permit number.  Except as provided in sections 28-455 and 41-1954, the department shall not release the social security number to any person unless the applicant requests that the social security number appear on the applicant's driver license or instruction permit as the driver license or instruction permit number.  The provisions of this subsection shall be included in each application. G. The department may adopt and implement procedures to deny a driver license or instruction permit to a person who has been deported.  The department may adopt and implement procedures to reinstate a person's privilege to apply for a driver license or permit if the person's legal presence status is restored. H. On request of an applicant, the department shall allow the applicant to provide on the license or permit a post office box address that is regularly used by the applicant. I. The department may request an applicant who appears in person for a license, a duplicate license or reinstatement of a driving privilege to complete satisfactorily the vision screening prescribed by the department. J. If a driver license applicant submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is a veteran, on request of the applicant, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the license that identifies the person as a veteran. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 28-3165, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3165. Nonoperating identification license; immunity; rules; emancipated minors; definition A. On receipt of an application from a person who does not have a valid driver license issued by this state or whose driving privilege is suspended, the department shall issue a nonoperating identification license that contains a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the full legal name, the date of birth, the residence address and a brief description of the licensee and either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space on which the licensee is required to write the licensee's usual signature with pen and ink. A nonoperating identification license that is issued to a person whose driving privilege is suspended shall not be valid for more than one hundred eighty days from the date of issuance. B. On request of an applicant: 1. The department shall allow the applicant to provide on the nonoperating identification license a post office box address that is regularly used by the applicant. 2. If the applicant submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is a veteran, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the nonoperating identification license that identifies that person as a veteran. 3. If the applicant elects to show and submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the nonoperating identification license that identifies the applicant as a native American. The distinguishing mark may not identify a specific Indian tribe or other specific personal information that is submitted on the documents that provide satisfactory proof that the person is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state. Documents that provide satisfactory proof that the person is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state include: (a) An enhanced tribal card. (b) A tribal identification card. (c) A tribal certificate of Indian blood. (d) A tribal or bureau of Indian affairs affidavit of birth. C. A person who is issued a license pursuant to this section shall use it only for identification purposes of the licensee.  The nonoperating identification license does not grant authority to operate a motor vehicle in this state. The department shall clearly label the nonoperating identification license "for identification only, not for operation of a motor vehicle". D. On issuance of a driver license, the holder of a nonoperating identification license shall surrender the nonoperating identification license to the department, and the department shall not refund any fee paid for the issuance of the nonoperating identification license. E. A nonoperating identification license shall contain the photograph of the licensee. When issuing a nonoperating identification license, the department shall use a process that prohibits as nearly as possible the ability to superimpose a photograph on the license without ready detection. The department shall process nonoperating identification licenses and photo attachments in color. F. On application, an applicant shall give the department satisfactory proof of the applicant's full legal name, date of birth, sex and residence address, if the applicant has a residence address, and that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.  The application shall briefly describe the applicant, state whether the applicant has been licensed, and if so, the type of license issued, when and by what state or country and whether any such license is under suspension, revocation or cancellation. The application shall contain other identifying information required by the department.  As necessary, the department may require other identifying information from the applicant. G. The department may adopt and implement procedures to deny a nonoperating identification license to a person who has been deported.  The department may adopt and implement procedures to reinstate a person's privilege to apply for a nonoperating identification license if the person's legal presence status is restored. H. A nonoperating identification license issued by the department is solely for the use and convenience of the applicant for identification purposes. I. The department shall adopt rules and establish fees for issuance of a nonoperating identification license, except that the department shall not require an examination. J. The fees established pursuant to this section do not apply to any of the following: 1. A person who is sixty-five years of age or older. 2. A person who is a recipient of public monies as an individual with a disability under title XVI of the social security act, as amended. 3. A veteran who does not have a residence address. 4. A veteran whose residence address is the address of a shelter that provides services to the homeless. 5. A child who is in the custody of the department of child safety. K. If a person qualifies for a nonoperating identification license and is under the legal drinking age, the department shall issue a license that is marked by color, code or design to immediately distinguish it from a nonoperating identification license issued to a person of legal drinking age. The department shall indicate on the nonoperating identification license issued pursuant to this subsection the year in which the person will attain the legal drinking age. L. If a minor has been emancipated pursuant to title 12, chapter 15, on application and proof of emancipation, the department shall issue a nonoperating identification license that contains the words "emancipated minor". M. Notwithstanding any other law, if an applicant for a nonoperating identification license is at least sixteen years of age and either does not have a residence address or is in the department of child safety's custody, the applicant does not need a signature of the applicant's parent, guardian, foster parent or employer. N. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-601. END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 28-3173, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3173. License update A. By written notice the department shall require a licensee to update the licensee's photograph or present or mail to the department in a form prescribed by the department a report based on a vision test performed by the department or an examination by an optometrist or an ophthalmologist or physician licensed to practice medicine, if the license has not been updated in the preceding twelve sixteen years. B. The director may require a licensee to update the licensee's license at any time during the twelve year sixteen-year period from the date of issuance. END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 28-3319, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3319. Action after license suspension, revocation or denial for driving under the influence or refusal of test; ignition interlock device requirement; definitions A. If, pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383, 28-3320 or 28-3322, the license of a driver or the driving privilege of a nonresident is suspended or revoked, the department shall not terminate the suspension or revocation or issue a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title until the person provides proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 9, article 3 of this title. B. If, pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383, 28-3320 or 28-3322, an unlicensed resident is denied a license or permit to operate a motor vehicle, the department shall not issue a license or permit until the person provides proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 9, article 3 of this title. C. If a person whose license or driving privilege is suspended or revoked pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-1385 is ordered, pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-1385, to attend alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment, the department shall not either: 1. Terminate the suspension or issue a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title until the person or licensed treatment facility provides proof that the person has completed or is participating satisfactorily in alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment. 2. Issue a new license or a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title to operate a motor vehicle after the revocation until the person or licensed treatment facility provides proof that the person has completed or is SATISFACTORILY participating in the court-ordered program. D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, on receipt of a report of conviction from a court for a violation that involved intoxicating liquor or that specifically requires the installation of a certified ignition interlock device, the department shall require any motor vehicle the convicted person operates to be equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock device and the convicted person to meet the requirements prescribed in section 28-1461 as follows: 1. For twelve months if: (a) Except as provided in subsection G H of this section, the person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 1 or section 28-1383, subsection A, paragraph 3, subdivision (a). (b) The department determines that within a period of eighty-four months the person is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of section 28-1381 or section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 1 with a prior conviction of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383. 2. For eighteen months if the person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 2. 3. For twenty-four months if: (a) The person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 2 and the department determines that within a period of eighty-four months the person has a prior conviction of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383. (b) The person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1383, subsection A, paragraph 1, 2, 4 or 5 or paragraph 3, subdivision (b). E. If a person is required to equip a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to subsection D of this section and the person has a medical condition that prevents the person from using the certified ignition interlock device during the entire time period required by subsection D of this section, the department of transportation shall require monthly alcohol and drug screening instead of the certified ignition interlock device for the time period prescribed by subsection D of this section.  The department of transportation shall require evidence of the medical condition that is satisfactory to the department of TRANSPORTATION and in a manner prescribed by the department of transportation from an authorized physician as defined in section 28-2409 or an authorized physician assistant as defined in section 28-2409.  The alcohol or drug screening shall be provided by a facility approved by the department of health services, the United States department of veterans affairs, a substance abuse counselor as defined in section 28-3005 or a probation department. F. The requirement prescribed in subsection D of this section begins on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment program requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. If the person is issued a special ignition interlock restricted driver license for the violations giving rise to the requirements prescribed in subsection D of this section or pursuant to section 28-1321, subsection P or section 28-1385, subsection J, the person shall be credited for the amount of time that a certified ignition interlock device is installed on the person's motor vehicle after the department authorizes the installation of the certified ignition interlock device on that person's motor vehicle. G. A person who is required to equip a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to this section shall comply with chapter 4, article 5 of this title. H. The department shall defer the remainder of the time period prescribed in subsection D, paragraph 1, subdivision (a) of this section commencing with the later of six months from the date the interlock was installed or the completion of the requirements of this subsection if all of the following apply: 1. The person is sentenced pursuant to section 28-1381, subsection I. 2. The person successfully completes an alcohol education program consisting of at least sixteen hours pursuant to section 28-1381. 3. The person has maintained a functioning ignition interlock device on all motor vehicles the person operates and has met the requirements of section 28-1461. 4. The person has not attempted to operate a vehicle with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more two or more times during the period of license restriction or limitation. 5. At the time of the offense, the person was not involved in a motor vehicle accident that resulted in physical injury or property damage. 6. All necessary compliance information has been provided to the department by the ignition interlock device provider, the alcohol screening program and the alcohol education program. I. The deferment pursuant to subsection H of this section is permanent, unless the person is arrested for a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 that occurs during the period of the deferment.  If the person is arrested as described in this subsection, the department shall revoke the deferment and require the person to complete the remainder of the time period prescribed in subsection D, paragraph 1, subdivision (a) of this section. J. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall reduce the length of time that a person is required to have a functioning certified ignition interlock device installed in a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection D of this section by the length of time that the person is incarcerated in a jail or prison facility for a violation of section 28-1381 or 28-1383 that did not involve intoxicating liquor. K. For the purposes of this section: , 1. "Certified ignition interlock device" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-1301. 2. "evidence-based PSYCHOTHERAPY" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-1381. END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Section 28-3321, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3321. Moving violations by persons under eighteen years of age; traffic survival school; suspension A person who holds a driver permit or license and who is found responsible for a moving civil traffic violation pursuant to this title or who is convicted of a moving criminal traffic offense pursuant to this title, excluding violations of sections 28-693, 28-695, 28-708, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 and 28-3174, and who commits the moving civil traffic violation or moving criminal traffic offense while the person is under eighteen years of age is subject to the following: 1. On receipt of the first record of judgment or conviction, the department shall order the person to attend and successfully complete traffic survival school educational sessions. 2. On receipt of the second record of judgment or conviction, the department shall suspend the person's driving privilege for three months. 3. On receipt of the third record of judgment or conviction, the department shall suspend the person's driving privilege for six months.END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Section 28-4882, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-4882. Junk vehicle; disposition A. If a vehicle has been reported abandoned under section 28-4838, the person making the report may request that the vehicle be processed as a junk vehicle.  An agent of the department shall inspect the vehicle to determine if the vehicle is a junk vehicle. B. On making a determination that the vehicle is a junk vehicle, the director shall cause a search of department records to be made, or if a junk vehicle is registered in another state, make inquiry of the vehicle registration agency in that state, to ascertain the name and address of the owner and lienholder, if any, or any other person identified on the department's record. C. On receipt of information disclosing the name and address of the owner and lienholder, if any, or any other person identified on the department's record who may have an interest in the vehicle, the director shall give notice to all interested persons of the director's intention to allow the disposition of the junk vehicle as prescribed by this section.  The director shall give the notice by mail within five days for a vehicle with a record in this state or within thirty days for all other vehicles. D. If the records of the department or out of state jurisdiction do not disclose the name and address of the owner and lienholder, if any, or any other person who is identified on the department's record and who may have an interest in the vehicle, or if the notice is returned marked unclaimed or addressee unknown, the department shall publish the notice of the intention of the director to allow the disposition of the junk vehicle as prescribed by this article once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the junk vehicle was found on the department's website for at least thirty days. The published notice shall include a statement that the department will make available to the public a complete vehicle description of junk vehicles. E. If the vehicle is unclaimed at the expiration of thirty days after the date placed on the notification mailed by the department or within ten days of the publication as provided in subsections C and D of this section, the director shall determine if the vehicle is a stolen vehicle. On receiving notification that the vehicle has not been reported stolen, the director shall issue written authorization to the owner of the property authorizing the owner of the property or a licensed automotive recycler to dispose of the junk vehicle pursuant to section 28-4883.END_STATUTE Sec. 11. Section 28-5606, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-5606. Imposition of motor fuel taxes A. In addition to all other taxes provided by law, a tax of eighteen cents $.18 per gallon is imposed on motor vehicle fuel possessed, used or consumed in this state. B. To partially compensate this state for the use of its highways: 1. A use fuel tax is imposed on use fuel used in the propulsion of a light class motor vehicle on a highway in this state at the same rate per gallon as the motor vehicle fuel tax prescribed in subsection A of this section, except that there is no use fuel tax on alternative fuels. 2. A use fuel tax is imposed on use fuel used in the propulsion of a use class motor vehicle on a highway in this state at the rate of twenty-six cents $.26 for each gallon, except that there is no use fuel tax on alternative fuels and use class vehicles that are exempt pursuant to section 28-5432 from the weight fee prescribed in section 28-5433 are subject to the use fuel tax imposed by paragraph 1 of this subsection. 3. Through December 31, 2024, a use fuel tax is imposed on use fuel used in the propulsion of a motor vehicle transporting forest products in compliance with the requirements of section 41-1516 on a highway in this state at the rate of nine cents for each gallon, except that there is no use fuel tax on alternative fuels. C. The motor vehicle fuel and use fuel taxes imposed pursuant to this section and the aviation fuel taxes imposed pursuant to section 28-8344 are conclusively presumed to be direct taxes on the consumer or user but shall be collected and remitted to the department by suppliers for the purpose of convenience and facility only.  Motor vehicle fuel, use fuel and aviation fuel taxes that are collected and paid to the department by a supplier are considered to be advance payments, shall be added to the price of motor vehicle fuel, use fuel or aviation fuel and shall be recovered from the consumer or user. D. Motor vehicle fuel and use fuel taxes imposed pursuant to this section on the use of motor vehicle fuel and use fuel and the aviation fuel taxes imposed pursuant to section 28-8344 on the use of aviation fuel, other than by bulk transfer, arise at the time the motor vehicle, use or aviation fuel either: 1. Is imported into this state and is measured by invoiced gallons received outside this state at a refinery, terminal or bulk plant for delivery to a destination in this state. 2. Is removed, as measured by invoiced gallons, from the bulk transfer terminal system or from a qualified terminal in this state. 3. Is removed, as measured by invoiced gallons, from the bulk transfer terminal system or from a qualified terminal or refinery outside this state for delivery to a destination in this state as represented on the shipping papers if a supplier imports the motor vehicle, use or aviation fuel for the account of the supplier or the supplier has made a tax precollection election pursuant to section 28-5636. E. If motor fuel is removed from the bulk transfer terminal system or from a qualified terminal or is imported into this state, the original removal, transfer or importation of the motor fuel is subject to the collection of the tax. If this motor fuel is transported to another qualified terminal or reenters the bulk transfer terminal system, the subsequent sale of the motor fuel on which tax has been collected is not subject to collection of an additional tax if proper documentation is retained to support the transaction. END_STATUTE Sec. 12. Section 28-5614, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-5614. Refunds; use fuel A. If a vendor pays the use fuel tax rate for use class motor vehicles on use fuel that is actually used in the propulsion of a light class motor vehicle on a highway in this state or that is actually used in the propulsion of a use class motor vehicle that is exempt pursuant to section 28-5432 from the weight fee prescribed in section 28-5433 on a highway in this state and for the purpose of convenience and facility only, the vendor may apply to the department for a refund of the difference between the amount of the use class motor vehicle use fuel tax paid and the amount of the light class motor vehicle use fuel tax on the same number of gallons purchased. B. If a person who transports forest products on a highway in this state in compliance with the requirements of section 41-1516 pays the use fuel tax rate prescribed in section 28-5606, subsection B, paragraph 2 for a use class motor vehicle that is eligible for the use fuel tax rate prescribed in section 28-5606, subsection B, paragraph 3, the person may apply to the department for a refund of the difference between the amount of the use fuel tax paid and the use fuel tax rate prescribed for a motor vehicle transporting forest products. C. B. The director may prescribe any forms the director deems necessary to implement this section. D. C. A vendor may file an application for a refund pursuant to this section on a monthly basis subject to the limitations prescribed in section 28-5612. E. D. The director shall: 1. Pay the refund from current use fuel tax receipts. 2. Deduct the refund from the monthly use fuel tax receipts before the deposit pursuant to section 28-5730 is made. END_STATUTE Sec. 13. Section 28-5805, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-5805. Motor vehicle powered by alternative fuel; classification; vehicle license tax; definitions A. A separate classification of motor vehicles is established for purposes of taxation pursuant to article IX, section 11, Constitution of Arizona, that consists of motor vehicles that are powered by alternative fuel and for which the department issues an alternative fuel vehicle special plate or sticker pursuant to section 28-2416. B. Notwithstanding section 28-5801, the registering officer shall collect at the time of application for and before registration of the motor vehicle that is classified under this section an annual license tax of $4 for each $100 in value.  The motor vehicle value is determined as follows: 1. For a motor vehicle that is registered in this state before January 1, 2022, the value of the motor vehicle is one percent of the manufacturer's base retail price of the motor vehicle.  After the first twelve months of the life of the motor vehicle as determined by its initial registration, the value of the motor vehicle is fifteen percent less for each twelve-month period than the value for the preceding twelve-month period. 2. For a motor vehicle that is initially registered in this state during a period beginning January 1, 2022 and ending December 31, 2022, during the first twelve months of the life of the motor vehicle as determined by its initial registration, the value of the motor vehicle is twenty percent of the manufacturer's base retail price of the motor vehicle. During each succeeding twelve-month period, the value of the motor vehicle is fifteen percent less than the value for the preceding twelve-month period. C. The registering officer shall collect the vehicle license tax on a motor vehicle that is powered by alternative fuel and that is initially registered from and after December 31, 2022 in accordance with section 28-5801.  The minimum amount of the vehicle license tax collected pursuant to this subsection must be in accordance with section 28-5801 and shall be distributed pursuant to section 28-5808, subsection B. D. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the minimum amount of the license tax computed under this section is $5 per year for each motor vehicle subject to the tax. E. Except as specifically provided in this section, the vehicle license tax on a motor vehicle classified under this section is governed by this article. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Alternative fuel" has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-215. 2. "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle that meets the safety standards of the national highway traffic safety administration and includes: (a) Neighborhood electric vehicles that meet the standards prescribed in 49 Code of Federal Regulations section 571.500, except that, if a vehicle is designed to be operated at speeds of twenty miles per hour or less, the vehicle is not required to have a seventeen digit vehicle identification number. (b) Neighborhood electric shuttles. END_STATUTE Sec. 14. Section 28-7041, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-7041. State highways and routes defined; primitive road designation A. The state highways, to be known as state routes, consist of the highways declared before August 12, 1927 to be state highways, under authority of law, that the board, after receipt of a recommendation from the director, may add to, abandon or change. If the board proceeds contrary to the recommendations of the director, it the board shall file a written report with the governor stating the reasons for the action. B. The state highways consist of the parts of the state routes designated and accepted as state highways by the board. A highway that has not been designated as a state route shall not become a state highway and any portion of a state route shall not become a state highway until it has been specifically designated and accepted by the board as a state highway and ordered to be constructed and improved. C. The director or the director's designee may designate a state highway or route as a PRIMITIVE ROAD. D. Neither this state or its employees are liable for damages or injuries resulting from the use of a primitive road designated pursuant to subsection C of this section except for intentional injuries or gross negligence caused by an employee acting within the scope of the employee's employment. E. The department shall place signs on each road designated as a primitive road in locations adequate to warn the public. These signs shall state "Primitive road, caution, use at your own risk. This surface is not regularly maintained". C. F. All highways, roads or streets that have been constructed, laid out, opened, established or maintained for ten years or more by the state or an agency or political subdivision of the state before January 1, 1960 and that have been used continuously by the public as thoroughfares for free travel and passage for ten years or more are declared public highways, regardless of an error, defect or omission in the proceeding or failure to act to establish those highways, roads or streets or in recording the proceedings. END_STATUTE Sec. 15. Section 28-8328, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-8328. Failure to register; assessment procedure If an aircraft is not registered within the time periods prescribed in this article, the director shall assess registration fees, license taxes and penalties due as follows: 1. The director shall give written notice of the assessment to the owner of the aircraft by either mailing the notice in a postage prepaid sealed envelope addressed to the owner of the aircraft at the owner's address as it appears in the records of the department or by delivery in person. Notice is deemed to be complete at the time of mailing or at the time of personal delivery electronic transmission. 2. The assessment is final thirty days after notice is deemed to be complete, unless, before that time, the department receives a written objection to the assessment and a request for a hearing from the owner. If the department receives a request for a hearing, the hearing shall be conducted as provided in section 28-8244. END_STATUTE Sec. 16. Implementation The department of transportation shall recall the honorary consular official special plates issued pursuant to section 28-2410, Arizona Revised Statutes, as repealed by this act, and shall issue each person a standard license plate in lieu of the honorary consular official special plate.